Massachusetts, session 194th, H1100.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of General Laws is hereby amended after section 2B by
adding the following new section:-

“Section 2C. “It shall be unlawful and constitute a violation of chapter 93A for any
domestic, admitted foreign, surplus lines and captive insurer, reinsurer, third party administrator
or Company as defined in section 1 of chapter 175 to include in any policy of property and
casualty insurance any language, form or endorsement which prohibits any insured(s) from
hiring, retaining, engaging, utilizing, consulting or contracting with a public insurance adjuster,
as defined in section 162 of chapter 175, or a public insurance adjusting firm, as a condition to
recovery under such policy of insurance. Any such language, form or endorsement shall be
unenforceable and shall be excised from the policy of insurance with all remaining policy
language, forms and endorsements unaffected.”
of 2


SECTION 2. Subsection (9) of section 3 of chapter 176D of the General Laws is hereby
amended after subsection (n) by adding the following new subsection:-

“(o) A policy provision in any policy of property or casualty insurance that prohibits an
insured from hiring a public adjuster for services provided pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.”
of 2